Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.035

Powers and duties—State agricultural market development programs and activities.

The department of agriculture is hereby designated as the agency of state government for the administration and implementation of state agricultural market development programs and activities, both domestic and foreign, and shall, in addition to the powers and duties otherwise imposed by law, have the following powers and duties:

(1) To study the potential marketability of various agricultural commodities of this state in foreign and domestic trade;

(2) To collect, prepare, and analyze foreign and domestic market data;

(3) To establish a program to promote and assist in the marketing of Washington-bred horses: PROVIDED, That the department shall present a proposal to the legislature no later than December 1, 1986, that provides for the elimination of all state funding for the program after June 30, 1989;

(4) To encourage and promote the sale of Washington's agricultural commodities and products at the site of their production through the development and dissemination of referral maps and other means;

(5) To encourage and promote those agricultural industries, such as the wine industry, which attract visitors to rural areas in which other agricultural commodities and products are produced and are, or could be, made available for sale;

(6) To encourage and promote the establishment and use of public markets in this state for the sale of Washington's agricultural products;

(7) To maintain close contact with foreign firms and governmental agencies and to act as an effective intermediary between foreign nations and Washington traders;

(8) To publish and disseminate to interested citizens and others information which will aid in carrying out the purposes of chapters 43.23, 15.64, 15.65, and 15.66 RCW;

(9) To encourage and promote the movement of foreign and domestic agricultural goods through the ports of Washington;

(10) To conduct an active program by sending representatives to, or engaging representatives in, foreign countries to promote the state's agricultural commodities and products;

(11) To assist and to make Washington agricultural concerns more aware of the potentials of foreign trade and to encourage production of those commodities that will have high export potential and appeal;

(12) To coordinate the trade promotional activities of appropriate federal, state, and local public agencies, as well as civic organizations; and

(13) To develop a coordinated marketing program with the department of commerce, utilizing existing trade offices and participating in mutual trade missions and activities.

As used in this section, "agricultural commodities" includes products of both terrestrial and aquatic farming.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2042; 1995 c 399 s 70; 1986 c 202 s 1; 1985 c 159 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Severability—1986 c 202: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 202 s 7.]

Legislative declaration and intent—1985 c 159: "The legislature declares that:

(1) Marketing is a dynamic and changing part of Washington agriculture and a vital element in expanding the state economy.

(2) The export of agricultural products produced in Washington state contributes substantial benefits to the economic base of the state, provides a large number of jobs and sizeable tax revenues to state and local governments, provides an important stabilizing effect on prices received by agricultural producers, and contributes to the United States balance of trade.

(3) State government should play a significant role in the development and expansion of markets for Washington grown and processed agricultural and food products.

(4) In order for state government to serve the best interests of agriculture in the area of market development, the role of state government in this area must be clearly defined.

(5) The department of agriculture, the department of commerce and economic development, and the IMPACT center at Washington State University, each possesses its own unique body of knowledge, expertise, and relationships that, when combined and applied in a logical and cooperative manner, will benefit the agricultural industry and the overall state economy and will provide a powerful force to seek aggressively new domestic and international markets for Washington's agricultural products.

It is the intent of the legislature to establish an organized agricultural market development function within state government with clearly defined areas of responsibility which will be responsive to the state's agricultural and food products industries' needs, without duplicating established private sector marketing efforts." [ 1985 c 159 s 1.]